Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Insurance Fraud Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Insurance;

(2) Director means the Director of Insurance;

(3) Insurer means any person or entity transacting insurance as defined in section 44-102 with or without a certificate of authority issued by the director. Insurer also means health maintenance organizations, legal service insurance corporations, prepaid limited health service organizations, dental and other similar health service plans, discount medical plan organizations, and entities licensed pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act and the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act. Insurer also means an employer who is approved by the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court as a self-insurer; and

(4) Statement includes, but is not limited to, any notice, statement, proof of loss, bill of lading, receipt for payment, invoice, account, estimate of property damages, bill for services, diagnosis, prescription, hospital or medical records, X-rays, test result, or other evidence of loss, injury, or expense, whether oral, written, or computer-generated.

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 272, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 547, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 31.

Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, see section 44-4201.

Intergovernmental Risk Management Act, see section 44-4301.